Utah statutes.
19-6-123.   Kilns -- Siting.

A cement kiln or lightweight aggregate kiln may not accept hazardous waste for recycling or for use as fuel without meeting the siting criteria for commercial hazardous waste treatment, storage, and disposal facilities established under Section 19-6-105.

